Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 8. Liability of Representatives; Administrators de Bonis Non.

§ 64.2-545.
Transfer of assets to administrator de bonis non; administration of assets.

If the powers of a personal representative have ceased and there is an administrator de bonis non of the decedent’s estate, the personal representative may pay and deliver to such administrator de bonis non, with the consent of the court or clerk before which the administrator de bonis non qualified, the assets of the decedent, whether converted or not, for which such former personal representative is responsible. The court or clerk shall not consent to the payment and delivery of such assets to the administrator de bonis non unless the administrator de bonis non gives a bond sufficient to cover the additional assets to be paid or delivered to him. The administrator de bonis non shall administer such assets paid or delivered to him as assets received in due course of administration. The administrator de bonis non shall provide a receipt for such assets in the form of a voucher in the settlement of the accounts of the former personal representative. The former personal representative shall not be liable for the assets lawfully paid or delivered to the administrator de bonis non.

The administrator de bonis non may bring an action against the former personal representative or his estate for mismanagement or to compel the payment and delivery to the administrator de bonis non of the assets of the decedent that were wrongfully converted by the former personal representative.

Nothing contained in this section shall (i) limit the liability of the former personal representative and his sureties for any breach of duty committed by him with respect to the assets of the decedent’s estate before they were paid over and delivered to the administrator de bonis non by him or (ii) bar the beneficiaries, creditors, or any other parties in interest from bringing any action against the former personal representative for his acts or omissions while serving as the personal representative.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-156; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-166; 1991, c. 58; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For 1991 survey on wills, trusts, and estates, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 925 (1991).

§ 64.2-546.
Action against representative of executor for waste.

An action may be maintained for waste of a decedent’s estate against (i) the personal representative of a person who, without any lawful authority, assumes to act as an executor or (ii) the personal representative of a rightful executor or administrator.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-157; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-167; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Civil Rights and ‘Personal Injuries’: Virginia’s Statute of Limitations for Section 1983 Suits,” see 26 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 199 (1985).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 84.

§ 64.2-547.
Revival of judgment by administrator de bonis non.

If an action is pending or a judgment has been rendered in the Commonwealth in favor of a personal representative upon a contract made during or for a cause of action that accrued in the lifetime of the decedent, the administrator de bonis non of the decedent may petition for execution upon such judgment, or to revive the pending action if the personal representative who brought the action could have maintained the same.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-158; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-168; 2012, c. 614.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 336.

§ 64.2-548.
Action against surety of personal representative; procedure.

An action may be brought against the surety of the personal representative for failure of the personal representative to discharge his duties faithfully if an execution on a judgment against a personal representative is returned unsatisfied.

The surety may plead any pleas and offer any evidence that the personal representative could have made or offered in an action against the surety of the personal representative for a devastavit.

History.

Code 1950, §§
64-159, 64-160; 1968, c. 656, §§ 64.1-169, 64.1-170; 2012, c. 614.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, §§ 271, 274.

§ 64.2-549.
Liability of personal representative or his surety.

The liability of a personal representative or his surety shall not exceed the assets of the decedent by reason of any omission or mistake in pleading or false pleading by such representative.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-160; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-170; 2012, c. 614.